Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2202
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Nurse Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-2203 to 38-2212 apply.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 758.